Utah statutes.
78B-1-204.   Appointment of more qualified interpreter.

If a qualified interpreter is unable to render a satisfactory interpretation, the appointing authority shall appoint a more qualified interpreter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

